District of Columbia statutes.
20-733

Right of heir or legatee.

Nothing shall excuse a personal representative, whether supervised or unsupervised, from the duty to mail or deliver inventories and accounts to each interested person as provided in sections 20-711 , 20-713 , 20-721 and 20-734 .

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(vv), 42 DCR 63
1981 Ed., § 20-733.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.